North Carolina statutes. Chapter 108A. Social Services.
Part 6. Medical Assistance Program.
§ 108A-60.
Protection of patient property.

It shall be unlawful for any person:

To willfully commingle or cause or solicit the commingling of the personal funds or moneys of a recipient resident of a provider health care facility with the funds or moneys of such facility; or

To willfully embezzle, convert, or appropriate or cause or solicit the embezzlement, conversion or appropriation of recipient personal funds or property to his own use or to the use of any provider or other person or entity.

A violation of subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall be a Class 1 misdemeanor. A violation of subdivision (a)(2) of this section shall be a Class H felony.

For purposes of this section:

“Health care facility” shall include skilled nursing facilities, intermediate care facilities, rest homes, or any other residential health care facility; and

“Person” includes any natural person, association, consortium, corporation, body politic, partnership, or other group, entity or organization; and

“Recipient” shall include current resident recipients, deceased recipients and recipients who no longer reside at such facility.

History.

1979, c. 510, s. 1; 1981, c. 275, s. 1; 1993, c. 539, ss. 816, 1300; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 108A-61.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1989, c. 701.

§ 108A-61.1.
Financial responsibility of a parent for a child under age 21 in a medical institution.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of the law, for the purpose of determining eligibility for medical assistance under Title XIX of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq., the income and financial resources of the natural or adoptive parents of a person who is under the age of 21 and who requires Medicaid covered services in a medical institution shall not be counted if the patient’s physician certifies, and the Division of Health Benefits or its agents approve, that continuous care and treatment are expected to exceed 12 months. For purposes of this subsection, “medical institution” means licensed acute care inpatient medical facilities providing medical, surgical, and psychiatric or substance abuse treatment, or facilities providing skilled or intermediate care, including intermediate care for individuals with intellectual disabilities.

History.

1993, c. 386, s. 1; 2019-81, s. 15(a); 2021-62, s. 4.1; 2021-88, s. 9(c).

§ 108A-62.
Therapeutic leave for medical assistance patients.

A medical assistance beneficiary at an intermediate care facility or skilled nursing facility may take therapeutic leave in accordance with this section without the facility losing reimbursement under the medical assistance program.

The maximum amount of therapeutic leave days that may be taken in a calendar year by a medical assistance beneficiary are as follows:

Ninety days for a beneficiary in an intermediate care facility.

Sixty days for a beneficiary in a skilled nursing facility.

No more than 15 consecutive days of therapeutic leave may be taken by a medical assistance beneficiary without the approval of one of the following:

The Division of Health Benefits of the Department.

The local management entity/managed care organization with which the beneficiary is enrolled under Chapter 122C of the General Statutes.

The prepaid health plan with which the beneficiary is enrolled under Chapter 108D of the General Statutes.

History.

1979, c. 925; 1981, c. 275, s. 1; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1014, s. 120; 1991, c. 126, s. 1; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 2019-81, s. 15(a); 2021-62, s. 3.1(a).

§ 108A-63.
Medical assistance provider fraud.

It shall be unlawful for any provider of medical assistance under this Part to knowingly and willfully make or cause to be made any false statement or representation of a material fact:

In any application for payment under this Part, or for use in determining entitlement to such payment; or

With respect to the conditions or operation of a provider or facility in order that such provider or facility may qualify or remain qualified to provide assistance under this Part.

It shall be unlawful for any provider of medical assistance to knowingly and willfully conceal or fail to disclose any fact or event affecting:

His initial or continued entitlement to payment under this Part; or

The amount of payment to which such person is or may be entitled.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e) of this section, any person who violates a provision of this section shall be guilty of a Class I felony.

“Provider” shall include any person who provides goods or services under this Part and any other person acting as an employee, representative or agent of such person.

In connection with the delivery of or payment for benefits, items, or services under this Part, it shall be unlawful for any provider of medical assistance under this Part to knowingly and willfully execute, or attempt to execute, a scheme or artifice to:

Defraud the Medical Assistance Program.

Obtain, by means of false or fraudulent pretenses, representations, or promises of material fact, any of the money or property owned by, or under the custody or control of, the Medical Assistance Program.

A violation of this subsection is a Class H felony. A conspiracy to violate this subsection is a Class I felony.

It shall be unlawful for any provider, with the intent to obstruct, delay, or mislead an investigation of a violation of this section by the Attorney General’s office, to knowingly and willfully make or cause to be made a false entry in, alter, destroy, or conceal, or make a false statement about a financial, medical, or other record related to the provision of a benefit, item, or service under this Part.

It shall be unlawful for any person to knowingly and willfully solicit or receive any remuneration (including any kickback, bribe, or rebate) directly or indirectly, overtly or covertly, in cash or in-kind:

In return for referring an individual to a person for the furnishing or arranging for the furnishing of any item or service for which payment may be made in whole or in part under this Part.

In return for purchasing, leasing, ordering, or arranging for or recommending purchasing, leasing, or ordering any good, facility, service, or item for which payment may be made in whole or in part under this Part.

It shall be unlawful for any person to knowingly and willfully offer or pay any remuneration (including any kickback, bribe, or rebate) directly or indirectly, overtly or covertly, in cash or in-kind to any person to induce such person:

To refer an individual to a person for the furnishing or arranging for the furnishing of any item or service for which payment may be made in whole or in part under this Part.

To purchase, lease, order, or arrange for or recommend purchasing, leasing, or ordering any good, facility, service, or item for which payment may be made in whole or in part under this Part.

Subsections (g) and (h) of this section shall not apply to:

Contracts between the State and a public or private agency where part of the agency’s responsibility is referral of a person to a provider.

Any conduct or activity that is specified in 42 U.S.C. § 1320a-7b(b)(3), as amended, or any federal regulations adopted pursuant thereto.

Nothing in subsections (g) and (h) of this section shall be interpreted or construed to conflict with 42 U.S.C. § 1320a-7b(b), as amended, or with federal common law or federal agency interpretations of the statute.

History.

1979, c. 510, s. 1; 1981, c. 275, s. 1; 2009-554, s. 3; 2010-185, s. 1.

§ 108A-63.1.
Health care fraud subpoena to produce documents.

The Attorney General, acting through the Medicaid Investigations Unit of the Department of Justice, may, when engaged in an investigation of an alleged violation of

G.S. 108A-63

and prior to the arrest of a suspect, issue in writing and cause to be served a subpoena to produce documents upon any corporation or governmental entity requiring the production of any records, books, papers, electronic media, objects, or other documents which may be relevant to a criminal investigation of a violation of

G.S. 108A-63

.

A subpoena under this section may require the custodian of records of the corporation or governmental entity to produce an affidavit certifying that the custodian made a thorough and diligent search for the documents requested and that the documents produced constitute all the records requested to the best of the custodian’s knowledge, information, and belief.

A subpoena under this section shall describe the documents required to be produced and prescribe a return date within a reasonable period of time, of no less than 20 days from the date of service, within which the documents can be assembled and made available.

A corporation or governmental entity may comply with a subpoena issued under this section by delivering the documents to the Medicaid Investigations Unit by any of the following methods:

By hand delivery.

By mailing the documents by certified mail.

By making the documents reasonably available for transfer to an agent of the Medicaid Investigations Unit at a place of business of the corporation or governmental entity.

If agreed to by the Medicaid Investigations Unit and the corporation or governmental entity, by any other means.

A corporation or governmental entity may move to quash or modify a subpoena issued under this section if it is oppressive or unreasonable or does not comply with the requirements of this section. The motion must be made before the time specified in the subpoena for production and may be made before a judge of the superior court.

In the case of failure by any corporation or governmental entity without adequate excuse to obey a subpoena issued under this section, the Attorney General may invoke the aid of a judge of the superior court. The court may issue an order requiring the subpoenaed corporation or governmental entity to appear before the Attorney General to produce records. Failure to obey the order of the court may be punished as contempt of court.

History.

2009-554, s. 2.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “The Drug (Pricing) Wars:
States, Preemption, and Unsustainable Prices,” see 99 N.C.L. Rev. 167 (2020).

§ 108A-64.
Medical assistance recipient fraud.

It shall be unlawful for any person to knowingly and willfully and with intent to defraud make or cause to be made a false statement or representation of a material fact in an application for assistance under this Part, or intended for use in determining entitlement to such assistance.

It shall be unlawful for any applicant, recipient or person acting on behalf of such applicant or recipient to knowingly and willfully and with intent to defraud, conceal or fail to disclose any condition, fact or event affecting such applicant’s or recipient’s initial or continued entitlement to receive assistance under this Part.

(b1)

It is unlawful for any person knowingly, willingly, and with intent to defraud, to obtain or attempt to obtain, or to assist, aid, or abet another person, either directly or indirectly, to obtain money, services, or any other thing of value to which the person is not entitled as a recipient under this Part, or otherwise to deliberately misuse a Medicaid identification card. This misuse includes the sale, alteration, or lending of the Medicaid identification card to others for services and the use of the card by someone other than the recipient to receive or attempt to receive Medicaid program coverage for services rendered to that individual.Proof of intent to defraud does not require proof of intent to defraud any particular person.

A person who violates a provision of this section shall be guilty of a Class I felony if the value of the assistance wrongfully obtained is more than four hundred dollars ($400.00).

A person who violates a provision of this section shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor if the value of the assistance wrongfully obtained is four hundred dollars ($400.00) or less.

For purposes of this section the word “person” includes any natural person, association, consortium, corporation, body politic, partnership, or other group, entity or organization.

History.

1981, c. 275, s. 1; 1993, c. 539, s. 817; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1995, c. 317, s. 1.

§ 108A-64.1.
Incentives to counties to recover fraudulent Medicaid expenditures.

The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health Benefits, shall provide incentives to counties that successfully recover fraudulently spent Medicaid funds by sharing State savings with counties responsible for the recovery of the fraudulently spent funds.

History.

2013-360, s. 12H.5; 2019-81, s. 15(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2019-81, s. 15(a), effective July 1, 2019, substituted “Division of Health Benefits” for “Division of Medical Assistance.”

§ 108A-65.
Conflict of interest.

It shall be unlawful for any person who is or has been an officer or employee of State or county government, and as such is or has been responsible for the expenditure of substantial amounts of federal, State or county money under the State medical assistance plan, or any person who is the partner of the present or former officer or employee, to engage in any of the following activities relating to the State medical assistance program:

Knowingly to act as agent or attorney for, or otherwise knowingly to represent, any person other than the United States, the State or a county, in any formal or informal appearance before, or with the intent to influence, make any oral or written communication on behalf of any other person other than the United States, the State or a county to:

Any department, agency, court, board, commission, legislature or committee of the United States, the State or a county, or any officer or employee thereof,

In connection with any of the following matters in which the United States, the State, or a county is a party or has a direct and substantial interest, such as any judicial or other proceeding, legislation, application, request for a ruling or other determination, contract, claim, controversy, investigation, charge, accusation, arrest, or other particular matter involving a specific party or parties,

In which he participated personally and substantially as an officer or an employee through decision, approval, recommendation, the rendering of advice, investigation or otherwise.

Within two years after his employment has ceased, knowingly to act as agent or attorney for, or otherwise knowingly to represent, any other person other than the United States, the State or a county, in any formal or informal appearance before, or, with the intent to influence, make any oral or written communication on behalf of any other person other than the United States, the State or a county to:

Any department, agency, court, board, commission, legislature or committee of the United States, the State, or a county, or any officer or employee thereof,

In connection with any of the following matters in which the United States, the State, or a county is a party or has a direct and substantial interest, such as, any judicial or other proceeding, legislation, application, request for a ruling or other determination, contract, claim, controversy, investigation, charge, accusation, arrest, or other particular matter involving a specific party or parties,

Which was actually pending under his official responsibility as an officer or employee within a period of one year prior to the termination of responsibility.

Within two years after his employment has ceased, knowingly to aid, counsel, advise, consult or by personal presence represent any other person other than the United States, the State or a county in any formal or informal appearance before:

Any department, agency, court, board, commission, legislature or committee of the United States, the State, or the county, or any officer or employee thereof,

In connection with any of the following matters in which the United States, the State, or a county is a party or has a direct and substantial interest, such as, any judicial or other proceeding, legislation, application, request for a ruling or other determination, contract, claim, controversy, investigation, charge, accusation, arrest, or other particular matter involving a specific party or parties,

Which was actually pending under his official responsibility as an officer or employee within the period of one year prior to the termination of such responsibility.

To participate personally and substantially as an officer or employee, through decision, approval, disapproval, recommendation, rendering of advice, investigation or otherwise, in a judicial or other proceeding legislation, application, request for a ruling or other determination, contract, claim, controversy, charge, accusation, arrest or other particular matter in which, to his knowledge, he, his spouse, minor child, partner, organization in which he is serving as an officer, director, trustee, partner or employee, or any person or organization with whom he is negotiating or has any arrangement concerning prospective employment, has a financial interest.

Violation of this statute is a Class 1 misdemeanor.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall annually identify and designate by rule or regulation those positions which are filled by State or county officers or employees who are responsible for the expenditure of substantial amounts of moneys under the State medical assistance plan.

History.

1981, c. 679, s. 1; 1993, c. 539, s. 818; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a).

§ 108A-66.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1989, c. 702.

§ 108A-66.1.
Medicaid buy-in for workers with disabilities.

Title. — This section may be cited as the Health Coverage for Workers With Disabilities Act. The Department shall implement a Medicaid buy-in eligibility category as permitted under P.L. 106-170, Ticket to Work and Work Incentives Improvement Act of 1999. The Department shall establish rules, policies, and procedures to implement this act in accordance with this section.

Definitions. — As used in this section, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

“FPG” means the federal poverty guidelines.

“HCWD” means Health Coverage for Workers With Disabilities.

“SSI” means Supplemental Security Income.

“Ticket to Work” means the Ticket to Work and Work Incentives Improvement Act of 1999.

Eligibility. — An individual is eligible for HCWD if:

The individual is at least 16 years of age and is less than 65 years of age;

The individual meets Social Security Disability criteria, or the individual has been enrolled in HCWD and then becomes medically improved as defined in Ticket to Work and as further specified by the Department. An individual shall be determined to be eligible under this section without regard to the individual’s ability to engage in, or actual engagement in, substantial gainful activity as defined in section 223 of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. § 423(d)(4)). In conducting annual redetermination of eligibility, the Department may not determine that an individual participating in HCWD is no longer disabled based solely on the individual’s participation in employment or earned income;

The individual’s unearned income does not exceed one hundred fifty percent (150%) of FPG, and countable resources for the individual do not exceed the resource limit for the minimum community spouse resource standard under 42 U.S.C. § 1396r, and as further determined by the Department. In determining an individual’s countable income and resources, the Department may not consider income or resources that are disregarded under the State Medical Assistance Plan’s financial methodology, including the sixty-five-dollar ($65.00) disregard, impairment-related work expenses, student earned-income exclusions, and other SSI program work incentive income disregards; and

The individual is engaged in a substantial and reasonable work effort (employed) as provided in this subdivision and as further defined by the Department and allowable under federal law. For purposes of this subsection, “engaged in substantial and reasonable work effort” means all of the following:

Working in a competitive, inclusive work setting, or self-employed.

Earning at least the applicable minimum wage.

Having monthly earnings above the SSI basic sixty-five-dollar ($65.00) earned-income disregard.

Being able to provide evidence of paying applicable Medicare, Social Security, and State and federal income taxes.The Department may impose additional earnings requirements in defining “engaged in substantial and reasonable work effort” for individuals who are eligible for HCWD based on medical improvement.Individuals who participate in HCWD but thereafter become unemployed for involuntary reasons, including health reasons, shall have continued eligibility in HCWD for up to 12 months from the time of involuntary unemployment, so long as the individual (i) maintains a connection with the workforce, as determined by the Department, (ii) meets all other eligibility criteria for HCWD during the period, and (iii) pays applicable fees, premiums, and co-payments.

Fees, Premiums, and Co-Payments. — Individuals who participate in HCWD and have countable income greater than one hundred fifty percent (150%) of FPG shall pay an annual enrollment fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) to their county department of social services. Individuals who participate in HCWD and have countable income greater than or equal to two hundred percent (200%) of FPG shall pay a monthly premium in addition to the annual fee. The Department shall set a sliding scale for premiums, which is consistent with applicable federal law. An individual with countable income equal to or greater than four hundred fifty percent (450%) of FPG shall pay not less than one hundred percent (100%) of the cost of the premium, as determined by the Department. The premium shall be based on the experience of all individuals participating in the Medical Assistance Program. Individuals who participate in HCWD are subject to co-payments equal to those required under the Medical Assistance Program.

History.

2005-276, s. 10.18(a); 2006-66, s. 10.9(a); 2007-144, s. 2; 2009-451, s. 10.69; 2013-360, s. 12H.10(f).

§ 108A-67.
Medicare/Qualified Disabled Working Individuals.

Qualified disabled working individuals are eligible for the payment of the Medicare Part A premium.
An individual is qualified for this payment:

If the Social Security Administration determines the individual to be a “Disabled Working Individual”;

If the individual’s income is less than two hundred percent (200%) of the current federal poverty level, as revised annually; and

If the individual is less than 65 years of age.

History.

1991, c. 127, s. 1.

§ 108A-68.
Drug Use Review Program; rules.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes or of any other provision of law, the Division of Health Benefits, Department of Health and Human Services, shall adopt rules implementing the drug use review provisions of the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1990, as amended.

History.

1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 900, s. 128; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 2019-81, s. 15(a).

§ 108A-68.1.
Certain prescription drugs exempt from prior authorization requirements.

Prior authorization shall not be required or utilized for any antihemophilic factor drugs prescribed for the treatment of hemophilia and blood disorders where there is no generically equivalent drug available. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the Secretary from implementing a disease management program.

History.

2003-179, s. 1; 2005-83, s. 1; 2009-210, s. 1.

§ 108A-68.2.
Beneficiary lock-in program for certain controlled substances.

The following definitions apply in this section:

Covered substances. — Any controlled substance identified as an opioid or benzodiazepine, excluding benzodiazepine sedative-hypnotics, contained in Article 5 of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes, unless one of the following conditions are met:

If the Department of Health and Human Services specifically identifies the opioid or benzodiazepine as a substance excluded from coverage by the Medicaid Beneficiary Management Lock-In Program described in its Outpatient Pharmacy Clinical Coverage Policy adopted in accordance with

G.S. 108A-54.2

, then the opioid or benzodiazepine is not a covered substance under this section.

If the Department of Health and Human Services specifically identifies a controlled substance contained in Article 5 of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes other than an opioid or benzodiazepine as a controlled substance covered by the Medicaid Beneficiary Management Lock-In Program described in its Outpatient Pharmacy Clinical Coverage Policy adopted in accordance with

G.S. 108A-54.2

, then the controlled substance is a covered substance under this section.

Lock-in program. — A requirement that a Medicaid or NC Health Choice beneficiary select a single prescriber and a single pharmacy for obtaining covered substances.

Prepaid health plan or PHP. — As defined in

G.S. 108D-1

.

, (c) Repealed by Session Laws 2021-62, s. 4.4, effective June 29, 2021.

(d)

This section does not apply to any lock-in program for Medicaid or NC Health Choice beneficiaries who are not enrolled in a Prepaid Health Plan.

(e)

A Prepaid Health Plan may develop a lock-in program for Medicaid or NC Health Choice beneficiaries who meet any of the following criteria:

Have filled six or more prescriptions for covered substances in a period of two consecutive months.

Have received prescriptions for covered substances from three or more providers in a period of two consecutive months.

Are recommended as a candidate for the lock-in program by a provider.

(f)

A lock-in program developed pursuant to subsection (e) of this section shall comply with all of the following:

(1)

A beneficiary shall not be subject to the lock-in program until the Prepaid Health Plan has notified the beneficiary in writing that the beneficiary will be subject to the lock-in program.

(2)

A beneficiary subject to the lock-in program shall be given the opportunity to select a single prescriber and a single pharmacy from a list of prescribers and pharmacies in the Prepaid Health Plan’s provider network. For any beneficiary who fails to select a single prescriber, the Prepaid Health Plan shall use algorithmic guidelines to assign the beneficiary a single prescriber from a list of prescribers in the Prepaid Health Plan’s network. For any beneficiary who fails to select a single pharmacy, the Prepaid Health Plan shall use algorithmic guidelines to assign the beneficiary a single pharmacy from a list of pharmacies in the Prepaid Health Plan’s network.

(3)

A beneficiary shall not be required to use the single prescriber or single pharmacy selected for the lock-in program to obtain prescriptions drugs covered by the Medicaid program or the Prepaid Health Plan that are not covered substances.

(g)

A Prepaid Health Plan’s use of a lock-in program developed pursuant to subsection (e) of this section shall not constitute a violation of the terms of a contract between the Prepaid Health Plan and the Department that relate to a beneficiary’s ability to utilize a pharmacy of choice.

History.

2018-49, s. 3(a); 2021-62, s. 4.4.

§ 108A-69.
Employer obligations.

As used in this section and in

G.S. 108A-70

:

“Health benefit plan” means an accident and health insurance policy or certificate; a nonprofit hospital or medical service corporation contract; a health maintenance organization subscriber contract; a plan provided by a multiple employer welfare arrangement; the State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees under Chapter 135 of the General Statutes; or a plan provided by another benefit arrangement. “Health benefit plan” does not mean a Medicare supplement policy as defined in

G.S. 58-54-1(5)

.

“Health insurer” means any health insurance company subject to Articles 1 through 63 of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes, including a multiple employee welfare arrangement, and any corporation subject to Articles 65 and 67 of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes; a group health plan, as defined in Section 607(1) of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974; and the State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees under Chapter 135 of the General Statutes.

If a parent is required by a court or administrative order to provide health benefit plan coverage for a child, and the parent is eligible for family health benefit plan coverage through an employer, the employer:

Must allow the parent to enroll, under family coverage, the child if the child would be otherwise eligible for coverage without regard to any enrollment season restrictions.

Must enroll the child under family coverage upon application of the child’s other parent or upon receipt of notice from the Department of Health and Human Services in connection with its administration of the Medical Assistance or Child Support Enforcement Program if the parent is enrolled but fails to make application to obtain coverage for the child.

May not disenroll or eliminate coverage of the child unless:

The employer is provided satisfactory written evidence that:

The court or administrative order is no longer in effect; or

The child is or will be enrolled in comparable health benefit plan coverage that will take effect not later than the effective date of disenrollment; or

The employer has eliminated family health benefit plan coverage for all of its employees.

Must withhold from the employee’s compensation the employee’s share, if any, of premiums for health benefit plan coverage, not to exceed the maximum amount permitted to be withheld under section 303(b) of the federal Consumer Credit Protection Act, as amended; and must pay this amount to the health insurer; subject to regulations, if any, adopted by the Secretary of the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services.

History.

1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 644, s. 3; 1995, c. 193, s. 44; 1997-433, s. 3.2; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 1998-17, s. 1; 1999-293, s. 8; 2007-323, s. 28.22A(o); 2007-345, s. 12.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-323, s. 28.22A(o), as amended by Session Laws 2007-345, s. 12, effective July 1, 2008, substituted “State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees” for “Teachers’ and State Employees’ Comprehensive Major Medical Plan” in subdivisions (a)(1) and (a)(2).

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

The medical child support enforcement provisions of House Bill 1563, 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994) N.C. Session Laws c. 644, are inapplicable to the North Carolina Teachers’ and State Employees’ Comprehensive Major Medical Plan (now State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees) and the governmental entities whose employees and retirees, along with their dependents, are eligible for coverage under the Plan or its HMO option. Medical child support orders nonetheless may be enforced directly against State employees and retirees who fail to enroll, or maintain coverage for, their eligible dependent children under the State Health Plan in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 50-13.4(f), 50-13.9 and 50-13.11. See opinion of Attorney General to Patricia Crawford, Associate General Counsel, University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill, 1995 N.C. AG LEXIS 6 (August 10, 1995).

§ 108A-70.
Recoupment of amounts spent on medical care.

To the extent necessary to reimburse the Department or a PHP for expenditures for costs under this Part, and provided that claims for current and past due child support shall take priority over claims for those expenditures, the Department may garnish the wages, salary, or other employment income of, and the Secretary of Revenue shall withhold amounts from State tax refunds to, any person who meets all of the following criteria:

Is required by court or administrative order to provide health benefit plan coverage for the cost of health care services to a child eligible for medical assistance under Medicaid.

Has received payment from a third party for the costs of such services.

Has not used such payments to reimburse, as appropriate, either the other parent or guardian of the child or the provider of the services.

To the extent that payment for covered services has been made under

G.S. 108A-55

for health care items or services furnished to an individual, in any case where a third party has a legal liability to make payments, the Department of Health and Human Services is considered to have acquired the rights of the individual to payment by any other party for those health care items or services.

History.

1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 644, s. 3; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 2019-81, s. 5.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2019-81, s. 5, effective October 1, 2019, rewrote subsection (a).

Legal Periodicals.

For 1997 legislative survey, see 20 Campbell L. Rev. 399.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

The medical child support enforcement provisions of House Bill 1563, 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994) N.C. Session Laws c. 644, are inapplicable to the North Carolina Teachers’ and State Employees’ Comprehensive Major Medical Plan (now State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees) and the governmental entities whose employees and retirees, along with their dependents, are eligible for coverage under the Plan or its HMO option. Medical child support orders nonetheless may be enforced directly against State employees and retirees who fail to enroll, or maintain coverage for, their eligible dependent children under the State Health Plan in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 50-13.4(f), 50-13.9 and 50-13.11. See opinion of Attorney General to Patricia Crawford, Associate General Counsel, University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill, 1995 N.C. AG LEXIS 6 (August 10, 1995).

§§ 108A-70.1 through 108A-70.3.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 108A-70.4.
Long-Term Care Partnership Program.

The following definitions apply in this section:

Asset. — Resources and income.

Department. — The Department of Health and Human Services.

Division. — The Division of Health Benefits.

Estate recovery. — The placing of a statutory claim on the estate of a deceased Medicaid recipient, as provided by

G.S. 108A-70.5

.

Medicaid. — The federal medical assistance program established under Title XIX of the Social Security Act.

Qualified long-term care partnership policy or qualified policy. — A long-term care insurance policy approved for use in North Carolina and that meets all the requirements of the federal Deficit Reduction Act of 2005, P.L. 109-171.

Resource. — Cash or its equivalent and real or personal property that is available to an applicant or recipient.

Resource disregard. — The amount of resources of an applicant for long-term care Medicaid that is equal to the amount of benefits paid to the applicant under a qualified long-term care partnership policy.

Resource protection. — An amount equal to the resource disregard given to a Medicaid recipient during the long-term care Medicaid eligibility determination process.

There is established the North Carolina Long-Term Care Partnership Program (Partnership Program) to be administered by the Division with assistance from the Department of Insurance. The Partnership Program shall:

Provide a mechanism for individuals to qualify for coverage of the cost of their long-term care needs under Medicaid without first being required to substantially exhaust their resources.

Provide counseling services to individuals planning for their long-term care needs.

Reduce the financial burden on the State medical assistance program by encouraging individuals to obtain private long-term care insurance.

Under the Partnership Program, the Department shall:

Provide resource disregard to an applicant for long-term care Medicaid who has received benefits under a qualified long-term care partnership policy. The amount of the resource disregard shall be equal to the total insurance benefits paid to the individual under a qualified policy after the implementation of the Partnership Program and prior to the individual’s first application for long-term care Medicaid.

Provide resource protection by reducing any subsequent recovery by the State under

G.S. 108A-70.5

from a deceased recipient’s estate for payment of Medicaid paid services by the amount of resource disregard given under subdivision (1) of this subsection.

The Department shall adopt rules and amendments to the State Plan to allow for resource disregard at long-term care Medicaid eligibility determination and resource protection at estate recovery. The Department and the Department of Insurance shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of the Partnership Program and to provide for its administration.

Effective January 1, 2011, or 60 days after approval of the Medicaid State Plan amendment, whichever is later, a qualified long-term care partnership policy shall be accompanied by a Partnership Disclosure Notice detailing in plain language the current law pertaining to the Partnership Program, resource disregard, and resource protection.

The Department may enter into a reciprocal agreement with other states that enter into a national reciprocity agreement to extend the resource disregard and resource protection to residents of the State who purchased, or purchased and used, a qualified long-term care policy in another state.

G.S. 108A-70.5

applies to the estate of an individual who received benefits under a qualified long-term care partnership policy.

History.

2010-68, s. 1; 2019-81, s. 15(a).

Contingent effective date.

Session Laws 2010-68, s. 5, made this section effective January 1, 2011, or 60 days after approval of the Medicaid State Plan amendment, whichever is later. The plan was approved January 6, 2011.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2019-81, s. 15(a), effective July 1, 2019, substituted “Division of Health Benefits” for “Division of Medical Assistance” in subdivision (a)(3).